Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.510

Charitable organization education program.

The secretary may, in conjunction with the attorney general, develop and operate an education program for charitable organizations, their board members, and the general public. To the extent practicable, the secretary shall consult with the nonprofit and charitable sector and the charitable advisory council created in RCW 19.09.550 to develop curriculum and other materials intended to educate charitable organizations, their board members, and the general public.

[ 2007 c 471 s 12.]